Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.260

Publications by commission—Subscriptions.

If the commission publishes a bulletin or other publication, or a section in some established trade publication, for the dissemination of information to the soft tree fruit industry in this state, the first two dollars of any assessment paid annually by each grower, handler, dealer, and processor of such fruit shall be applied to the payment of his or her subscription to such bulletin or publication.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6044; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.260. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 27; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-36.]